Utah statutes.
53-11-103.   Commissioner of Public Safety administers -- Licensure -- Rulemaking.

(1)  The commissioner administers this chapter, including keeping records of:

(a)  all applications for licenses under this chapter; and

(b)  proof of workers' compensation required to be filed.

(2)  Records shall include statements as to whether a license or renewal license has been issued for each application and bond.

(3)  If a license is revoked, suspended, or canceled, or a license is denied or placed on probation, the commissioner shall ensure the date of filing the order for revocation, suspension, cancellation, denial, or probation is included in the records.

(4)  The commissioner shall maintain a list of all individuals, firms, partnerships, associations, or corporations that have had a license revoked, suspended, placed on probation, or canceled and a written record of complaints filed against licensees.

(5) (a)  The commissioner may make rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, as necessary to administer this chapter.

(b)  These rules shall include a requirement that all providers offering instruction or continuing instruction required for licensure under this chapter shall offer the courses to all applicants at the same course fees, in order to be qualified by the board.

(6)  All records referred to under this section are open to the public under Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act, except licensees' residential addresses and telephone numbers.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

